Hawaii statutes.
§147-75 Notice of grade and size;
designation of origin of imported eggs. It shall be unlawful for any
person to sell, or offer to sell, or expose for sale to a consumer, any eggs,
other than those of the person's own production at the place of production,
intended for human consumption, without notifying, by suitable sign or label,
the person purchasing or intending to purchase the same whether the same are
imported from the mainland United States or foreign countries or of island
production, and the exact grade or quality and the size or weight of the eggs,
according to the standards prescribed by the department of agriculture.

The word "island" shall be used to
designate the geographic origin of eggs produced in this State.

Eggs imported from the mainland United States
or foreign countries shall be individually marked as to origin. Imported eggs
shall not be removed from any dock or landing without permission of the
department of agriculture and shall not be processed, sold, or offered for sale
until the consignee thereof has been furnished with a certificate from the
department of agriculture certifying that the eggs contained in the shipment in
which the eggs arrived are marked as provided in this section and rules of the
department of agriculture; provided that eggs which are intended for hatching
or sale as balut and eggs which are preserved with an outer covering of ashes
and salt need not be marked as herein provided. [L 1931, c 70, §5; RL 1935,
§1077; am L 1935, c 164, §1; am L 1939, c 175, §1; RL 1945, §1308; am L 1953, c
242, §1; am L 1955, c 167, §§2, 4; RL 1955, §22-74; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22;
am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §147-75; am L 1983, c 177, §3; gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 55, §1]

Case Notes

Cited: 41 H. 565,
571; 47 H. 652, 660, 394 P.2d 618.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next